Mississippi, session 2026, HB195.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  Each school district shall conduct at least one (1) mandatory parent meeting no less than thirty (30) calendar days prior to the commencement of each school year.  The meeting shall provide an overview of academic goals, policies, safety procedures and other critical information pertaining to the upcoming school year. (2)  Each school district shall document the attendance of parents or legal guardians at the meeting. Documentation shall include a signature from the attending parent or legal guardian, either in person or electronically when attending via videoconference. (3)  School districts shall provide at least one (1) make-up meeting opportunity for parents unable to attend the initial meeting.  Make-up meetings may be conducted in person, via videoconference, or through other appropriate means as determined by the school district. (4)  School districts must offer an option for parents to participate via videoconferencing platforms such as Microsoft Teams, Zoom or other comparable videoconferencing technology. Attendance through videoconference shall be documented using electronic verification methods. SECTION 2. (1)  (a)  A parent or legal guardian who fails to attend either the mandatory meeting or the make-up meeting shall be assessed a fine of One Hundred Dollars ($100.00). (b)  School districts shall notify parents in writing of the penalty and provide instructions for payment. (2)  (a) Parents who demonstrate legitimate hardship, including but not limited to, medical emergencies, shall be exempt from the penalty upon submission of appropriate documentation.  Each school district shall establish an appeals process to review and resolve disputes regarding noncompliance. SECTION 3. (1)  Each school district shall adopt rules and regulations to implement and enforce the provisions of this act, including the methods for collecting fines. (2)  Fines collected under this act shall be deposited into a designated fund within the school district to support parental engagement programs. SECTION 4.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.